Hawaii statutes.
§309-1 Participation in United Student Aid
Funds, Inc. or other similar public or private nonprofit corporations. The
department of budget and finance is hereby authorized to enter into a contract
with the United Student Aid Funds, Inc., or such other public or private
nonprofit corporations as may be designated by or established pursuant to
Public Law 89-329, Public Law 89-287 or similar federal laws, relating to loans
to students. Such contract may be amended or revised by the department to
assure the full utilization of benefits provided by Public Law 89-329 and
Public Law 89-287 and similar federal laws. [L 1963, c 90, pt of §1 and c 114,
§1; Supp, §44B-1; am L 1966, c 16, pt of §2; HRS §309-1; am L 1968, c 49, pt of
§2]

Cross References

Loans for university and community college students, see §§304A-601
to 604 and 304A-2160.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next